Mississippi, session 2026, HB855.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-41-45, which prohibits abortion except for the preservation of the mother's life or where the pregnancy is caused by rape, is repealed. SECTION 2.  Section 97-3-3, which creates a felony crime for any person who willfully and knowingly causes any pregnant woman to abort or miscarry a child, is repealed. SECTION 3.  Section 97-3-4, which creates a felony crime for allowing a child delivered in failed abortion to die, is repealed. SECTION 4.  Section 97-3-5, which creates a misdemeanor crime for any person who provides an instrument or medicine to assist a woman in obtaining an abortion, is repealed. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.